District of Columbia statutes.
1-327.71

Definitions.

For the purposes of this part, the term:

(1)

“DC One Card” means a credential issued by the District government as a single credential for purposes of accessing multiple District facilities, programs, and benefits, including public libraries, facilities of the Department of Parks and Recreation, and public schools.

(2)

“Electronic chip” means a smart chip, radio frequency identification chip, or other contact or contact-less electronic media, including a Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority Smartrip chip, embedded in a DC One Card, to be read by participating agencies and programs for identification of the cardholder.

History

Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 1002, 57 DCR 181

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1002 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1002 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).

Short Title

Short title: Section 1001 of D.C. Law 18-111 provided that subtitle A of title I of the act may be cited as the “Technology Services Support Act of 2009”.